District of Columbia statutes.
23-582

Arrests without warrant by other persons.

(a)

A special policeman shall have the same powers as a law enforcement officer to arrest without warrant for offenses committed within premises to which his jurisdiction extends, and may arrest outside the premises on fresh pursuit for offenses committed on the premises.

(b)

A private person may arrest another —

(1)

who he has probable cause to believe is committing in his presence —

(A)

a felony; or

(B)

an offense enumerated in section 23-581(a)(2); or

(2)

in aid of a law enforcement officer or special policeman, or other person authorized by law to make an arrest.

(c)

Any person making an arrest pursuant to this section shall deliver the person arrested to a law enforcement officer without unreasonable delay.

History

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 630, Pub. L. 91-358, title II, § 210(a)
Apr. 30, 1988, D.C. Law 7-104, § 7(e), 35 DCR 147

Cross References

Appointment and compensation of special policemen, see § 5-129.02.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 23-562.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 23-582.
1973 Ed., § 23-582.